Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.96.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Eligible student" means a student who:

(a) Is a resident student;

(b) Demonstrates financial need as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(c) Has indicated they will attend an institution of higher education or is making satisfactory progress in a program, as defined in rule by the office, at an institution of higher education;

(d) Fills out the Washington application for state financial aid; and

(e) Does not qualify for federally funded student financial aid because of their citizenship status.

(2) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.92.030.

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance created in RCW 28B.76.090.

(4) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received an undocumented student support loan.

(5) "Resident student" means:

(a) A financially independent student who has had a domicile in the state of Washington for the period of one year immediately prior to the time of commencement of the first day of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution and has in fact established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than educational;

(b) A dependent student, if one or both of the student's parents or legal guardians have maintained a bona fide domicile in the state of Washington for at least one year immediately prior to commencement of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution;

(c) Any student:

(i) Who has spent at least seventy-five percent of both his or her junior and senior years in high schools in this state;

(ii) Whose parents or legal guardians have been domiciled in the state for a period of at least one year within the five-year period before the student graduates from high school; and

(iii) Who enrolls in a public institution of higher education within six months of leaving high school, for as long as the student remains continuously enrolled for three quarters or two semesters in any calendar year; or

(d) Any person who meets the requirements under RCW 28B.15.012(2)(e).

[ 2021 c 272 s 8; 2020 c 326 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Findings—Short title—2021 c 272: See notes following RCW 28B.50.920.